Washington statutes.
RCW 43.376.040

Training requirement.

Training required under RCW 43.376.020 for state agency employees must include at a minimum:

(1) Effective communication and collaboration between state agencies and Indian tribes;

(2) Cultural competency in providing effective services to tribal governments and tribal members; and

(3) Use of training services such as those provided through the governor's office of Indian affairs.

[ 2012 c 122 s 4.]